es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Sacos y mantas para bebés: Mantas de recepción de bebé; Mantas para dormir de bebé
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 襁褓/婴儿包毯: 包毯; 襁褓毯
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Kundaklar: Bebek Battaniyesi; Kundak Battaniyesi
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Harsoliinat ja kapalot: Harsoliinat; Kapalot
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Vystymo antklodės ir antklodės naujagimiams: Antklodės naujagimiams; Vystymo antklodės
ko: 영유아 > 속싸개 담요: 겉싸개; 속싸개
sv: Baby och småbarn > Lindningsfiltar och bebisfiltar: Babyfiltar; Sovpåsar
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Deke za povijanje i nošenje beba: Deke za nošenje beba; Deke za povijanje beba
cs: Děti a kojenci > Peřinky a zavinovačky: Zavinovačky; Peřinky
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Couvertures d’emmaillotage et couvertures pour bébés: Couvertures pour bébé; Couvertures à emmailloter
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Faixas e cobertores de receção: Cobertores de receção; Cobertores para envolver
nb: Baby og barn > Bæresjal og babypledd: Babypledd; Bæresjal
nl: Baby en peuter > Inbaker- en omslagdoeken: Katoenen babydekens; Wikkeldeken baby
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒包巾: 嬰兒包毯; 包巾
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Pături pentru înfășare și primire: Pături pentru primire; Pături pentru înfășare
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Beciki i kocyki niemowlęce: Koce do karmienia; Koce do tulenia
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Puckdecken & Mulltücher: Mulltücher; Mullwindeln
pt-BR: Infantil > Cueiros para enrolar bebês: Cueiros; Saco de dormir para bebês
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Одеяла за повиване и изписване: Одеяла за изписване; Одеяла за повиване
ja: ベビー用品 > おくるみ用毛布: レシービングブランケット; スワドリングブランケット
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Pólyázó és köszöntő takarók: Köszöntő takarók; Pólyázó takarók
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > ผ้าห่มตัวทารก: ผ้าห่อตัวทารก; ผ้าห่อตัว
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Odeje za povijanje in tetra odeje: Tetra odeje; Odeje za povijanje
da: Baby og småbørn > Babysvøb og -tæpper: Babytæpper; Babysvøb
sk-SK: Bábätká > Zavinovačky: Zavinovačky; Zavinovačky
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Κουβέρτες φασκιώματος & υποδοχής: Κουβέρτες υποδοχής; Κουβέρτες φασκιώματος
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Chăn mền quấn em bé: Chăn nhận bé; Chăn quấn bé
it: Bebè e bimbi > Coperte per fasciatura: Copertine per neonati; Copertine fascianti per neonati
ru: Товары для детей > Пеленки, пеленальные конверты и коконы: Пеленки; Пеленальные конверты и коконы
en: Baby & Toddler > Swaddling & Receiving Blankets: Receiving Blankets; Swaddling Blankets